California, session 20252026, AB1004.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7930.205 of the Government Code is amended to read:7930.205. The following provisions may operate to exempt certain records, or portions thereof, from disclosure pursuant to this division:Taxpayer information, confidentiality, local taxes, Section 7925.000, this code.Tax preparer, disclosure of information obtained in business of preparing tax returns, Section 17530.5, Business and Professions Code.Teacher, credential holder or applicant, information provided to Commission on Teacher Credentialing, confidentiality of, Section 44341, Education Code.Teacher, certified school personnel examination results, confidentiality of, Section 44289, Education Code.Telephone answering service customer list, trade secret, Section 16606, Business and Professions Code.Timber yield tax, disclosure to county assessor, Section 38706, Revenue and Taxation Code.Timber yield tax, disclosure of information, Section 38705, Revenue and Taxation Code.Title insurers, confidentiality of notice of noncompliance, Section 12414.14, Insurance Code.Tobacco products, exemption from disclosure for distribution information provided to the State Department of Public Health, Section 22954, Business and Professions Code.Tow truck driver, information in records of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, Department of Motor Vehicles, or other agencies, confidentiality of, Sections 2431 and 2432.3, Vehicle Code.Toxic Substances Control, Department of, inspection of records of, Section 25152.5, Health and Safety Code.Trade secrets, Section 1060, Evidence Code.Trade secrets, confidentiality of, occupational safety and health inspections, Section 6322, Labor Code.Trade secrets, disclosure of public records, Section 3426.7, Civil Code.Trade secrets, food, drugs, cosmetics, nondisclosure, Sections 110165 and 110370, Health and Safety Code.Trade secrets, protection by Director of Pesticide Regulation, Sections 7924.300 to 7924.335, inclusive, this code.Trade secrets and proprietary information relating to pesticides, confidentiality of, Sections 14022 and 14023, Food and Agricultural Code.Trade secrets, protection by Director of Industrial Relations, Section 6396, Labor Code.Trade secrets relating to hazardous substances, disclosure of, Sections 78480 to 78495, inclusive, and Section 78930, Health and Safety Code.Traffic violator school licensee records, confidentiality of, Section 11212, Vehicle Code.Traffic offense, dismissed for participation in driving school or program, record of, confidentiality of, Section 1808.7, Vehicle Code.Transit districts, questionnaire and financial statement information in bids, Section 99154, Public Utilities Code.Tribal financial information, Section 8450, this code.Tribal-state gaming compacts, exemption from disclosure for records of an Indian tribe relating to securitization of annual payments, Section 63048.63, this code.Trust companies, disclosure of private trust confidential information, Section 1602, Financial Code.SEC. 2. Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 8450) is added to Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 5.7. Tribal Financial Information8450. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe and any department, division, subdivision, agency, or arm or instrumentality thereof.(2) “Financial assistance” means grants, cooperative agreements, noncash contributions or donations of property, direct appropriations, food commodities, and other financial assistance provided by a public agency.(3) “Public agency” has the same meaning as the term is defined in Section 7920.525.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any record that contains financial information provided by an Indian tribe to a public agency, as a condition of or requirement for receiving financial assistance shall be confidential, shall not be a public record, and shall not be open to public inspection.(c) Each public agency agreement or contract with an Indian tribe related to financial assistance shall contain a provision stating that any financial information disclosed pursuant to the agreement or contract shall remain confidential, shall not be a public record, and shall not be open to public inspection.(d) The Legislature finds and declares that the records described in subdivision (b) are records of a sovereign nation and are not subject to disclosure by private citizens or the state.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 1 and 2 of this act, which amend Section 7930.205 of, and add Section 8450 to, the Government Code, address a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 1 and 2 of this act, which amend Section 7930.205 of, and add Section 8450 to, the Government Code, impose a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to respect tribal sovereignty, while also collecting tribal financial information needed to make a decision on financial assistance, it is necessary to preserve the confidentiality of this information.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 1 and 2 of this act, which amend Section 7930.205 of, and add Section 8450 to, the Government Code, further, within the meaning of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the purposes of that constitutional section as it relates to the right of public access to the meetings of local public bodies or the writings of local public officials and local agencies. Pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the Legislature makes the following findings:In order to respect tribal sovereignty, while also collecting tribal financial information needed to make a decision on financial assistance, it is necessary to preserve the confidentiality of this information.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.